Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1806
Mandated project bonds, defined.

Mandated project bonds means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness that are issued by a public entity or by a mandated project bond issuer, the proceeds of which are used directly or indirectly to pay or reimburse mandated project costs and financing costs and which bonds are secured by and payable from mandated project charges.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB141, § 5.